Massachusetts, session 194th, S910.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary and to the maximum extent
allowed by federal law a Multiple Employer Welfare Arrangement or Association Health Plan
shall be allowed to operate in the Commonwealth, provided that it meets the following
requirements:
1. The arrangement shall at all times be in compliance with federal law and regulation,
including but not limited to the US Department of Labor’s regulations regarding Association
Health Plans.
2. The arrangement’s governing documents shall require the arrangement to be
actuarially sound, and the arrangement shall in fact be actuarially sound.
of 2

3. The arrangement shall be conducted in accordance with Massachusetts General Laws
Chapter 266 section 30 and Massachusetts General Laws Chapter 93A.
of 2